Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-102
Executive officers; duty to report to Governor.

It shall be the duty of the several officers of the executive department to make a written report to the Governor of the public business entrusted to their charge, whenever required by him so to do.

Laws 1867, § 2, p. 101;

R.S.1913, § 5532;

C.S.1922, § 4828;

C.S.1929, § 84-103;

R.S.1943, § 84-102.